Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.023

Disarming a law enforcement or corrections officer.

(1) A person is guilty of disarming a law enforcement officer if with intent to interfere with the performance of the officer's duties the person knowingly removes a firearm or weapon from the person of a law enforcement officer or corrections officer or deprives a law enforcement officer or corrections officer of the use of a firearm or weapon, when the officer is acting within the scope of the officer's duties, does not consent to the removal, and the person has reasonable cause to know or knows that the individual is a law enforcement or corrections officer.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, disarming a law enforcement or corrections officer is a class C felony.

(b) Disarming a law enforcement or corrections officer is a class B felony if the firearm involved is discharged when the person removes the firearm.

[ 2003 c 53 s 82; 1998 c 252 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.